Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.009

Department of health—Enforcement employees declared to be peace officers—Authority.

Employees of the department, who are designated by the commission as enforcement officers, are declared to be peace officers and shall be vested with police powers to enforce chapters 18.64, 69.04, 69.36, 69.40, 69.41, and 69.50 RCW and all other laws enforced by the commission.

[ 2013 c 19 s 6; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 411; 1985 c 7 s 59; 1979 c 90 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 82 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.